Maryland, session 2025, HB0372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
12–901.
In this subtitle, “target area” means the City of Mount Rainier, the Town of
Brentwood, the Town of Cottage City, the City of Bladensburg, the Town of Colmar Manor,
and the Town of North Brentwood in Prince George’s County.
12–902.
There is a Prince George’s Gateway Development Authority in Prince George’s
County.
12–903.
(a) The Authority consists of the following members:
– 1 –

Ch. 182 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) the Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(3) the mayor of the City of Mount Rainier, or the mayor’s designee;
(4) the mayor of the Town of Brentwood, or the mayor’s designee;
(5) the chair of the Cottage City Commission, or the chair’s designee;
(6) the mayor of the City of Bladensburg, or the mayor’s designee;
(7) the mayor of the Town of Colmar Manor, or the mayor’s designee;
(8) the mayor of the Town of North Brentwood, or the mayor’s designee;
(9) the director of the Economic Development Department for the City of
Mount Rainier; and
(10) two members who are residents of communities impacted by the target
area selected by the majority vote of the leadership of the target area municipalities.
(b) The Authority shall meet at least four times per year.
(c) Staff of the Prince George’s County Redevelopment Authority shall provide
support for the operation of the Authority in consultation with the Department of Housing
and Community Development.
12–904.
(a) The Authority may manage appropriated funds from municipalities in the
target area, Prince George’s County, and the State.
(b) The Authority may receive donated services from accountants, lawyers, or
other consultants as necessary to carry out this subtitle.
(c) The Authority may supervise, manage, and terminate staff and consultants
as necessary.
12–905.
A member of the Authority:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Authority; but
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 182
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
12–906.
(a) The Authority shall support the development and approval of a comprehensive
neighborhood revitalization plan in the target area to benefit:
(1) the residents;
(2) housing;
(3) neighborhoods;
(4) economic development; and
(5) transportation, including motor vehicles and pedestrians.
(b) On or before October 31, 2025, the Authority shall report its comprehensive
neighborhood revitalization strategy to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee and the
House Appropriations Committee.
Chapter 466 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2023. [It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of
September 30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.]
Chapter 467 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2023. [It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of
September 30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 3 –